Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 24
CHILDREN’S MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES

Sec.

§ 16-2401. Short title.

This chapter governing the access to the continuum of services for children with serious emotional disturbance may be cited as the “Children’s Mental Health Services Act.”

§ 16-2402. Legislative purposes.

It is the policy of the legislature and the state of Idaho that services for children with serious emotional disturbance should be planned and implemented to maximize the support of the family’s ability to provide adequate safety and well-being for the child at home. If the child cannot receive adequate services within the family home to maintain individual safety and well-being, community resources shall be provided to minimize the need for institutional or other residential placement. The legislature finds that family involvement and participation in the child’s treatment planning and implementation is vital to successful intervention for children with serious emotional disturbance.

Services to address mental health needs are one part of a broad array of services which should be available to Idaho’s children with special needs. Such services shall maximize the preservation of the family, by coordination and collaboration of services with schools and community. The department of health and welfare, the department of education, the department of juvenile corrections, school districts, counties and any other appropriate entities, shall cooperate and collaborate in planning, developing and providing services, and shall consult with counties and private providers of mental health services.

Services shall be individually planned to meet the unique needs of each child and family. Such planning shall include the parent, guardian or surrogate parent(s) of each child. The continuum of services shall include, but not be limited to, individual and family counseling, crisis intervention services, day treatment, respite care, therapeutic foster homes, family support services, residential treatment and inpatient services. These services shall be available to meet the needs of Idaho’s children with serious emotional disturbance or mental illness and their families. Services shall be provided without requiring that parents relinquish custody of the child.

This chapter is intended to achieve, and shall be construed to promote, these legislative purposes:

To empower families of children with serious emotional disturbance to determine their own needs and to make decisions and choices, concerning them;

To give families of children with serious emotional disturbance the support they need, to maintain a stable, nurturing home environment for the children, and to respond to the needs of the entire family, without requiring families to accept services that they do not desire or seek;

To utilize out-of-home placement only after families are provided supportive services and those services are inadequate to provide a reasonable level of safety and well-being for the child and family, or when an emergency exists which requires immediate intervention. Any placement of a child out of home shall follow the principles of least restrictive alternative placement as defined in this chapter and shall be for the shortest period of time necessary to provide for the safety and well-being of the child and family;

To plan, develop, deliver, and evaluate services for children with serious emotional disturbance in an efficient, coordinated and collaborative statewide system, of individualized services;

To provide services in settings that are close to the patterns and norms of society and sensitive to the regional, cultural, and ethnic characteristics of Idaho’s families and communities;

To provide services for families as close to their home communities as possible and to promote integration of families into their communities;

To make use of the capacities of local communities to complement existing public and private community resources, including natural and informal supports provided by family and friends;

To give priority to planning, developing, implementing, and evaluating children’s mental health services to prevent, ameliorate, or reduce the impact of serious emotional disturbance on families;

To assist all state and local public and private agencies and service providers to provide appropriate, flexible, and cost-effective home and community-based services for families;

All state agencies providing services to children with serious emotional disturbances prior to the passage of this chapter shall maintain their existing level of services to this population.

All department and private providers acting under this chapter shall:

Identify and coordinate all available resources, both formal and informal, public and private, so that the needs of families can be met and their strengths can be applied;

Include participation of families with children with serious emotional disturbance in all phases of planning, developing, implementing, and evaluating the programs that affect them;

Be flexible, so that families will have power to decide what services to use, how to use them, and how often to use them;

Apply a family centered approach in working with families;

Respect a family’s method of problem solving and their preferred methods of communication;

Be sensitive to families’ social, economic, physical and other environments;

Disseminate information so that eligible families will know of the availability of services;

Provide services in a manner to ensure uninterrupted and consistent availability of services between children’s and adult services when the child reaches the age of majority;

Refrain from any discrimination on the basis of race, gender, religion, ethnicity, national origin, or disabling condition in the employment of individuals, and in providing services.

§ 16-2403. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Child” means an individual less than eighteen (18) years of age and not emancipated by either marriage or legal proceeding.

“Consistent with the least restrictive alternative principle” means that services are delivered in the setting that places the fewest restrictions on the personal liberty of the child and that provides the greatest integration with individuals who do not have disabilities, in typical and age-appropriate school, community and family environments, which is consistent with safe, effective and cost-effective treatment for the child and family.

“Department” means the department of health and welfare.

“Designated examiner” means a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker and such other mental health professionals as may be designated in accordance with rules promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, by the department of health and welfare. Any person designated by the department director will be specially qualified by training and experience in the diagnosis and treatment of mental or mentally related illnesses or conditions.

“Director” means the director of the state department of health and welfare.

“Emergency” means a situation in which the child’s condition, as evidenced by recent behavior, poses a significant threat to the health or safety of the child, his family or others, or poses a serious risk of substantial deterioration in the child’s condition which cannot be eliminated by the use of supportive services or intervention by the child’s parents, or mental health professionals, and treatment in the community while the child remains in his family home.

“Informed consent to treatment” means a knowing and voluntary decision to undergo a specific course of treatment, evidenced in writing, and made by an emancipated child, or a child’s parent, or guardian, who has the capacity to make an informed decision, after the staff of the facility or other provider of treatment has explained the nature and effects of the proposed treatment.

“Involuntary treatment” means treatment, services and placement of children provided without consent of the parent of a child, under the authority of a court order obtained pursuant to this chapter, as directed by an order of disposition issued by a designated employee of the department of health and welfare under section 16-2415, Idaho Code.

“Lacks capacity to make an informed decision concerning treatment” means that the parent is unable to understand the nature and effects of hospitalization or treatment, or is unable to engage in a rational decision-making process regarding such hospitalization or treatment, as evidenced by an inability to weigh the risks and benefits, despite conscientious efforts to explain them in terms that the parent can understand.

“Likely to cause harm to himself or to suffer substantial mental or physical deterioration” means that, as evidenced by recent behavior, the child:

Is likely in the near future to inflict substantial physical injury upon himself;

Is likely to suffer significant deprivation of basic needs such as food, clothing, shelter, health or safety; or

Will suffer a substantial increase or persistence of symptoms of mental illness or serious emotional disturbance which is likely to result in an inability to function in the community without risk to his safety or well-being or the safety or well-being of others, and which cannot be treated adequately with available home and community-based outpatient services.
(11) “Likely to cause harm to others” means that, as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening such harm with the apparent ability to complete the act, a child is likely to cause physical injury or physical abuse to another person.

(12) “Protection and advocacy system” means the agency designated by the governor as the state protection and advocacy system pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 6042 and 42 U.S.C. 10801 et seq.

(13) “Serious emotional disturbance” means a diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders (DSM) diagnosable mental health, emotional or behavioral disorder, or a neuropsychiatric condition which results in a serious disability, and which requires sustained treatment interventions, and causes the child’s functioning to be impaired in thought, perception, affect or behavior. A disorder shall be considered to “result in a serious disability” if it causes substantial impairment of functioning in family, school or community that is measured by and documented through the use of a standardized instrument approved by the department and conducted or supervised by a qualified clinician. A substance abuse disorder does not, by itself, constitute a serious emotional disturbance, although it may coexist with serious emotional disturbance.

(14) “Special therapy” means any treatment modality used to treat children with serious emotional disturbances which is subject to restrictions or special conditions imposed by the department of health and welfare rules.

(15) “Surrogate parent” means any person appointed to act in the place of the parent of a child for purposes of developing an individual education program under the authority of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., as amended.

(16) “Teens at risk” means individuals attending Idaho secondary public schools who have been identified as expressing or exhibiting indications of depression, suicidal inclination, emotional trauma, substance abuse or other behaviors or symptoms that indicate the existence of, or that may lead to, the development of mental illness or substance abuse.

(17) “Treatment facility” means a facility or program meeting applicable licensing standards that has been approved for the provisions of services under this chapter by the department of health and welfare.

§ 16-2404. Community services and supports and interagency collaboration.

Lead agency. The department of health and welfare shall be the lead agency in establishing and coordinating community supports, services and treatment for children with serious emotional disturbance and their families, utilizing public and private resources available in the child’s community. Such resources shall be utilized to provide services consistent with the least restrictive alternative principle, to assist the child’s family to care for the child in his home and community whenever possible. The state department of education shall be the lead agency for educational services.

Planning. The department of health and welfare, the state department of education, the department of juvenile corrections, counties, and local school districts shall collaborate and cooperate in planning and developing comprehensive mental health services and individual treatment and service plans for children with serious emotional disturbance making the best use of public and private resources to provide or obtain needed services and treatment.

Teens at risk. The department of health and welfare, the state department of education, the department of juvenile corrections, counties, courts and local school districts may collaborate and cooperate in planning and developing mental health counseling, substance abuse treatment and recovery support services and individual service plans for teens at risk.

Contracting. The department of health and welfare shall also have the authority to enter into contracts with school districts to provide teen early intervention specialists as provided for in section 16-2404A, Idaho Code.

§ 16-2404A. Teen early intervention mental health and substance abuse specialist program.

The department of health and welfare shall be authorized to contract for teen early intervention specialists to work with teens at risk and their families in school districts.

The teen early intervention specialist shall be a certified counselor or a social worker with a clinical background in mental health or substance abuse as prescribed by the department of health and welfare by rule.

The salary paid to the teen early intervention specialist shall be equivalent to the salary paid to comparably trained and experienced individuals employed by the school district in the region in which the community resource is employed.

Teen early intervention specialists shall work with individual teens at risk to offer group counseling, recovery support, suicide prevention and other mental health and substance abuse counseling services to teens as needed, regardless of mental health diagnosis.

By permission of school administrators, as prescribed in rule, teens at risk not currently enrolled in a public school may, if assigned by a judge, participate in group or individual teen early intervention specialist counseling sessions or services for teens at risk as appropriate.

School districts seeking to have one (1) or more teen early intervention specialists placed within its district may apply to the department of health and welfare for such placement. The department of health and welfare shall establish by rule a simple application process and criteria for placement of teen early intervention specialists in districts. The number of teen early intervention specialists placed in school districts in any given year shall be limited by the funds appropriated to the teen early intervention specialist program in that fiscal year. In evaluating applications for the three (3) year pilot project, the department of health and welfare shall give special consideration to rural districts and shall consider:

The demonstrated need for mental health and substance abuse counseling and treatment for teens at risk in the school district;

The resources and cooperation which the school district has proposed to contribute to the support of the teen early intervention specialist program for teens at risk; and

The funding appropriated to the teen early intervention specialist program for teens at risk.

Through an initial three (3) year period beginning at the start of the 2008 school year, the department of health and welfare shall work with local school districts where teen early intervention specialists have been placed to gather data on the effectiveness of this program. This data may be gathered and tracked through cooperative projects with Idaho colleges and universities and may include, but not be limited to:

Impacts on the number and nature of teen arrests;

Reductions in the number of teen suicides and suicide attempts;

Changes in patterns of teen incarceration or involvement with Idaho’s juvenile justice system;

Impacts on local caseloads of practitioners in the department of health and welfare;

Where applicable, impacts to juvenile mental health or drug courts;

Changes in academic achievement by teens at risk and by those participating in the teen early intervention specialist program; and
(g) Changes in the number and nature of student disciplinary actions in schools where teen early intervention specialists have been placed.

§ 16-2405. Charges to parents.

Parents may be charged for services provided to their children by the department according to the sliding fee scale authorized by section 16-2433, Idaho Code, provided that all services which are part of the child’s free appropriate public education as defined in the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., as amended, shall be provided to the child at no cost to the parents.

§ 16-2406. Access to services.

Access to services for children with serious emotional disturbance and their families shall be voluntary whenever informed consent can be obtained. Involuntary treatment or commitment to the department’s custody shall not be required as a condition for obtaining, providing, or paying for treatment by the department. The department’s assistance with paying for a child’s treatment and other services under this chapter shall be based upon the rules adopted by the department and by the sliding fee scale developed under section 16-2433, Idaho Code. Department payments to service providers are only made pursuant to a written agreement between the department and the service provider. The agreement must reflect cost-effective services for the child.

The family and the department may enter into a services agreement if:

The child meets the department’s eligibility criteria for treatment or services; and

The child and his parents request mental health services from the department; or

The family requests full or partial payment for services by the department (other than payment through medical assistance, title XIX of the social security act, as amended); or

The youth is involuntarily placed by the department under this chapter.

For purposes of this chapter, a services agreement is a written agreement, binding on the parties, which specifies at a minimum:

The legal status of the child; and

The rights and obligations of the parents or guardians, the child and the department while the child is in the out-of-home placement.

When a child is placed out of his home pursuant to a services agreement or a one hundred twenty (120) day involuntary treatment order by the court, the department shall have the responsibility for the child’s placement and care. The financial obligation of the family will be determined after consideration of all available payment and funding sources including title XIX of the social security act, as amended, all available third party sources, and parent resources according to any order for child support under chapter 10, title 32, Idaho Code. Services shall not be conditioned on transfer of custody or parental rights.

§ 16-2407. Voluntary admission to hospital or residential treatment facility.

When the department provides services under this chapter, such services shall be provided on a voluntary basis whenever informed consent can be obtained, and the department shall ensure that services made available to children subject to involuntary treatment orders are also available on a comparable basis to children seeking services on a voluntary basis.

Admission of children. A treatment facility may admit a child after examining the child and interviewing the family, if a clinician with authority to admit patients to the facility determines that the child is seriously emotionally disturbed and is in need of hospitalization or residential services and, the child’s parent, custodian or guardian give [gives] such consent to treatment. Prior to such admission, the child and his parent, custodian or guardian shall be advised orally and given a written statement of his rights under this chapter as provided in section 16-2426, Idaho Code, provided that, if the condition of the child is such that notice and advice of his rights would be ineffective, and this determination is recorded in the child’s record, such advice to the child may be deferred until the child’s mental and emotional condition permits, but for no more than forty-eight (48) hours. Each child and parent shall be asked to sign an acknowledgment that they have been so advised, and this acknowledgment shall be kept in the child’s record.

A child shall not be voluntarily admitted to a facility operated by the department unless evaluated and referred by a person on the staff of the regional family and children’s services program.

When a child is in a voluntary, out-of-home placement which is funded in whole or in part by state or federal funds, the department may have the propriety of the placement reviewed by the district court of the county in which the child is placed or the county of the child’s residence every one hundred eighty (180) days after placement or as required by statutes which govern federal funding for children who are placed out of their homes.

§ 16-2408. Discharge or petition for one hundred twenty day treatment order.

Any child who is voluntarily admitted to a treatment facility upon the consent of his parents or guardian shall be discharged within three (3) business days of a written request for discharge by the consenting person unless such request is withdrawn in writing or there is other legal authority to hold the child at the facility.

§ 16-2409. Conversion from involuntary to voluntary status.

Upon approval by the court, a child who is subject to involuntary treatment under this chapter may at any time convert to a voluntary status if informed consent to treatment can be obtained from his parent or guardian. The court shall approve conversion from involuntary to voluntary status if the court finds that:

The child is not likely to cause harm to himself or suffer substantial mental or physical deterioration; and
(1)(a) The child is not likely to cause harm to himself or suffer substantial mental or physical deterioration; and

The child is not likely to cause harm to others; or

The conversion from involuntary to voluntary status is in the best interests of the child and consistent with the requirements of public safety.

§ 16-2410. Review of voluntary admission.

A child admitted on the consent of his parents, shall have his admission reviewed at the end of a thirty (30) day period from the initial date of admission to the program. The review shall be accomplished by having the child’s treating clinician review the child’s treatment and determine whether continued out-of-home treatment at the facility is still necessary and consistent with the least restrictive alternative principle. If the clinician decides that it is, he or she shall record the findings on a form to be filed in the child’s record. The facility shall notify the child and his parents at least seven (7) days prior to the thirty (30) day review and give them an opportunity to comment on the need, if any, for continued inpatient or residential treatment. The facility shall ensure that the child and his parents are aware of the right to request discharge as set forth above.

If the facility staff determines that the parent of the child understands these rights and the parent of the child desires to continue treatment, then the facility staff shall so certify on a form designated by the department. These forms shall be kept in the child’s patient record, and sent to the child’s parent, guardian or custodian. This procedure shall take place every thirty (30) days from the date of the last admission.

§ 16-2411. Emergency mental health response and evaluation — Temporary detention by a peace officer or health care professional.

A peace officer may take a child into protective custody and immediately transport the child to a treatment facility for emergency mental health evaluation in the absence of a court order if and only if the officer determines that an emergency situation exists as defined in this chapter, and the officer has probable cause to believe, based on personal observation and investigation, representation of the child’s parents or the recommendation of a mental health professional, that the child is suffering from serious emotional disturbance as a result of which he is likely to cause harm to himself or others or is manifestly unable to preserve his health or safety with the supports and assistance available to him and that immediate detention and treatment is necessary to prevent harm to the child or others.

For purposes of this section, “health care professional” means a physician, physician’s assistant or advanced practice registered nurse, any one (1) of whom then is practicing in a hospital. A health care professional may detain a child if such person determines that an emergency situation exists as defined in this chapter, and such person has probable cause to believe that the child is suffering from a serious emotional disturbance as a result of which he is likely to cause harm to himself or others or is manifestly unable to preserve his health or safety with the supports and assistance available to him and that immediate detention and treatment is necessary to prevent harm to the child or others. If the hospital does not have an appropriate facility to provide emergency mental health care, it may cause the child to be transported to an appropriate treatment facility. The health care professional shall notify the parent or legal guardian, if known, as soon as possible and shall document in the patient’s chart the efforts to contact the parent or legal guardian. If the parent or legal guardian cannot be located or contacted, the health care professional shall cause a report to be filed as soon as possible and in no case later than twenty-four (24) hours with the Idaho department of health and welfare or an appropriate law enforcement agency. The child may not be detained against the parent or legal guardian’s explicit direction unless the child is taken into protective custody pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, except that the child may be detained for a reasonable period of time necessary for a peace officer to be summoned to the hospital to make a determination under subsection (1) of this section.

If a child has been taken into protective custody by a peace officer under the provisions of this section, the officer shall immediately transport the child to a treatment facility or mental health program, such as a regional mental health center, a mobile crisis intervention program, or a therapeutic foster care facility, provided such center’s program or facility has been approved by the regional office of the department for that purpose. The department shall make a list of approved facilities available to law enforcement agencies.

Upon taking the child into protective custody or detaining the child pursuant to this section, the officer or health care professional shall take reasonable precautions to safeguard and preserve the personal property of the child unless a parent or guardian or responsible relative is able to do so. Upon presenting a child to a treatment facility, the officer shall inform the staff in writing of the facts that caused him to detain the child and shall specifically state whether the child is otherwise subject to being held for juvenile or criminal offenses.
(5) If the child who is being detained by a peace officer is not released to the child’s parent, guardian or custodian, the law enforcement agency shall contact the child’s parent, guardian or custodian as soon as possible, and in no case later than twenty-four (24) hours, and shall notify the child’s parent, guardian or custodian of his status, location and the reasons for the detention of the child. If the parents cannot be located or contacted, efforts to comply with this section and the reasons for failure to make contact shall be documented in the child’s record.

§ 16-2412. Emergency treatment upon certification by designated examiner.

A child may be taken into protective custody by a peace officer, or accepted by an ambulance service, and transported and presented to a treatment facility for emergency evaluation and treatment when a designated examiner certifies in writing that he has examined the child within the last seventy-two (72) hours and that on such basis he has probable cause to believe that such child is suffering from serious emotional disturbance as a result of which he is likely to:

Harm himself or others; or

Suffer substantial mental or physical deterioration; and

Require immediate treatment to prevent such harm; and

Less restrictive alternatives have been considered and the detention and treatment proposed is consistent with the least restrictive alternative principle.

§ 16-2413. Emergency admission and treatment facility determination.

Upon the presentation of a child to a treatment facility pursuant to section 16-2411, Idaho Code, the facility shall accept the child and shall promptly examine him to determine whether he meets the criteria for emergency evaluation and treatment set forth below.

The child shall be admitted for emergency evaluation and treatment only if a clinician with authority to admit the child determines that there is probable cause to believe that such child is suffering from serious emotional disturbance as a result of which he is likely to:

Harm himself or others; or

Suffer substantial mental or physical deterioration; or

Cause harm to others and immediate treatment is necessary to prevent such harm; and

Less restrictive alternatives have been considered and the placement and treatment proposed is consistent with the least restrictive alternative principle.

If the examining physician determines that there is not probable cause to believe that the child meets the criteria for emergency evaluation and treatment, the child shall be released to his parents who shall arrange transportation. If the child was presented to the treatment facility by a law enforcement officer and was otherwise subject to detention for a juvenile or criminal offense, he shall remain under the protective custody of the law enforcement officer. The treatment facility shall notify the law enforcement officer and detain the child until law enforcement responds to transport the child to detention.

The treatment facility shall advise any child admitted for emergency evaluation and treatment of the purposes and possible duration of emergency evaluation and of his rights under this chapter as soon after admission as his medical condition permits in the manner prescribed in section 16-2426, Idaho Code.

§ 16-2414. Order for emergency evaluation.

Each child who is admitted to a treatment facility under section 16-2413, Idaho Code, shall, within twenty-four (24) hours of being taken into protective custody, be released to his parent or guardian, unless a court order authorizing emergency evaluation has been obtained.

The evidence supporting the claim that an emergency exists with respect to the child shall be submitted to a court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds that an emergency situation exists, it shall issue an order for emergency evaluation, which shall authorize the treatment facility to hold the child for up to forty-eight (48) hours at which time he shall be released to his parent or guardian, unless valid consent to voluntary treatment has been obtained under section 16-2407, Idaho Code, or other legal authority is sought to hold the child.

Each child and parent shall also be informed orally and in writing by the evaluation facility of the purposes and the possible consequences of the proceedings, the allegations in the petition, the child’s right to communicate with an attorney, and the right to receive necessary and appropriate treatment.

At all stages of the proceeding the court shall consider whether treatment may be voluntarily obtained by the child and his family. If the treatment can be voluntarily obtained, the petition shall be dismissed.

The court may also order that the prosecuting attorney of the county review the appropriateness of the case for filing a petition under the child protective act or the juvenile corrections act.

A child shall not be admitted under this section to a facility operated by the department unless evaluated and authorized by a staff of the regional family and children’s services program.

§ 16-2415. Dispositional authority.

Whenever the involuntary treatment of the child requires payment from public funds, other than medicaid funds, the department, or other funding agency shall have the authority to determine the placement for the child and to make decisions concerning the purchase and provision of mental health services, consistent with the plan of treatment approved by the court.

When the cost of the child’s treatment can be paid from private sources or by medicaid, the parent shall have the authority to determine the child’s placement and services, consistent with the plan of treatment approved by the court.

All expenditures under the medicaid program shall be governed by the laws and rules applicable to that program.

The department shall issue a disposition order within two (2) days of the order for involuntary treatment.

§ 16-2416. One hundred twenty day involuntary treatment order.

Children may be treated involuntarily for a period of up to one hundred twenty (120) days upon a petition filed by the treatment facility or by the parent, guardian, prosecuting attorney or other interested party. The petition shall set forth the facts supporting the allegations and, in the case of petitions filed by a treatment facility, shall describe why the child requires treatment, a detailed description of the symptoms or behaviors of the child that support the allegations in the petition, a list of the names and addresses of any witnesses the petitioner intends to call at the involuntary treatment hearing. The petition shall also contain a statement of the alternatives to court-ordered involuntary treatment that have been considered and the reasons for rejecting the alternatives. The petition shall be filed with the court and copies shall be served upon the person and upon a parent, the next of kin, guardian or custodian and the person’s attorney. The copies of the petition shall be accompanied by a notice advising of the child’s rights concerning the proceeding.

Upon filing of a petition for involuntary treatment of a child who is not currently under emergency evaluation or voluntary admission, the court shall issue a summons to the child to submit to an examination by two (2) designated examiners. At least one (1) designated examiner shall be a psychiatrist, licensed physician or licensed psychologist. Each designated examiner shall promptly prepare a report on his examination and file it with the court. Copies shall be promptly served upon the child, parent, custodian, guardian and the child’s attorney.

§ 16-2417. Hearing on the one hundred twenty day involuntary treatment order.

Every child for whom a petition for involuntary treatment has been filed, shall be notified by the court sufficiently in advance to be able to prepare for the hearing and shall receive a prompt hearing. For children confined for emergency psychiatric evaluation or currently under voluntary admission, this hearing shall take place within three (3) business days of the filing of the petition.

The child shall be present at the hearing unless the court finds:

That he has knowingly and voluntarily waived such a right after consulting with counsel, and his counsel shall submit a verified written statement to the court explaining the attorney’s understanding of the child’s intent; or

That because his behavior at the hearing is so disruptive, it cannot reasonably continue in his presence.

Any child who is unable to pay for counsel shall have the right to be provided with counsel at public expense to prepare for and represent him at the hearings.

The prosecuting attorney shall represent the interests of the state at the hearing.

The Idaho rules of evidence and the Idaho rules of civil procedure shall be applied so as to facilitate informal, efficient presentation of all relevant, probative evidence and resolution of issues with due regard to the interests of all parties.

The child shall have the right:

To be represented by counsel;

To present evidence, including testimony of a mental health professional of his own choosing;

To cross-examine witnesses;

To a complete record of the proceedings;

To an expeditious appeal of an adverse ruling.

At the conclusion of the hearing, or within one (1) business day thereafter, the court shall make its findings.

The court shall enter an order discharging the child unless it finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child satisfies all criteria for involuntary treatment in section 16-2418, Idaho Code, in which event it shall enter an involuntary treatment order as provided in section 16-2416, Idaho Code, for evaluation and treatment for a period of no longer than one hundred twenty (120) days.

If at any time during a one hundred twenty (120) day (or any subsequent) period of involuntary treatment, a child is absent without permission, the involuntary treatment order constitutes a continuing authorization and responsibility to the treatment facility and to any law enforcement officer to procure his return.

Hearings may be held in the treatment facility whenever the child is an inpatient at the time of the hearing.